Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB607.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 4187.9. Fuel and diesel fuel tax transparency.(a) Labeling.--Each retailer of automotive fuel and diesel fuel in this Commonwealth shall label, in a clear and conspicuous manner on an automotive fuel dispenser used to sell or offer or expose for sale automotive fuel or diesel fuel, the following taxes levied to a consumer of automotive fuels or diesel fuel:(1) Federal liquid fuels tax.(2) State liquid fuels tax.(3) Federal diesel fuel tax.(4) State diesel fuel tax.123456789101112131415161718 (5) Aggregate Federal liquid fuels tax and State liquid fuels tax.(6) Aggregate Federal diesel fuel tax and State diesel fuels tax.(b) Label maintenance.--The department shall affix and maintain a label under subsection (a) in a consistent location on a fueling dispenser under this section. The owner or operator of a retailer of automotive fuel or diesel fuel in this Commonwealth shall not be liable for affixing or maintaining a fuels tax label under this section.(c) Label cost.--The department may not charge a retailer any cost for an initial label or replacement label under subsection (a) if the label becomes illegible or otherwise unable to be affixed to the fuel dispenser.(d) Label design.--The secretary shall promulgate regulations necessary for the implementation of this section and transmit notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The secretary shall:(1) Within 60 days of the effective date of this subsection, design a label that displays, in legible font, the current rate of taxes levied to a consumer of automotive fuel or diesel fuel under subsection (a).(2) Update the label under paragraph (1) with any changes to the rate of taxes under subsection (a) within 60 days of the effective date of the tax rate change and affix the label to a fuel dispenser.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:20250SB0607PN0624 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Diesel fuel." As defined under 75 Pa.C.S. § 9002 (relating to definitions)."Federal diesel fuel tax." The rate of tax levied under 26 U.S.C. § 4081(a)(2)(A)(iii) (relating to imposition of tax) on diesel fuel as defined under 26 U.S.C. § 4083 (relating to definitions; special rule; administrative authority)."Federal liquid fuels tax." The rate of tax levied under 26 U.S.C. § 4081(a)(2)(A)(i) on gasoline as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 4083."State diesel fuel tax." The aggregate rate of tax levied on diesel fuel under 75 Pa.C.S. Chs. 90 (relating to liquid fuels and fuels tax) and 95 (relating to taxes for highway maintenance and construction)."State liquid fuels tax." The aggregate rate of tax levied under 75 Pa.C.S. Chs. 90 and 95 on liquid fuels as defined under 75 Pa.C.S. § 9002.Section 2. All regulations and parts of regulations are abrogated to the extent of any inconsistency with the provisions of this act.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0607PN0624 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920